Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.190

Violations—Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or aids or abets such violation, or any rule lawfully adopted under this chapter or any order made under this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1999 c 151 s 111; 1967 c 201 s 19.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1999 c 151: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.